src-fst-morphology-stems-stems-verbs-moh.lexc.md
Verbs
Verbs in Mohawk language are actions.

Red verbs are essentially non-transitive verbs used in Active Voice
Blue verbs are essentially non-transitive verbs used in Passive Voice
Purple verbs are transitive verbs

-----------------------VERBS ---------------------------------------

--------------some example c-stem verbs (verb stems starting with a constant)
to like
to love
to like
to love

-------------verb stems starting with an "A"
to be hungry (page 131)
to be lucky (page 131)

-------------verb stems starting with an "I"
to be  poor (page 132)
to be sleeping
-------------verb stems starting with an "E" or "EN"
to like the taste of something (page 131)
lazy (page 131)
--------------verb stems starting with an "O" or "ON"
to make smth, Brian's list
to enjoy doing smth Brian's page 14

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/stems-verbs-moh.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-moh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/stems-verbs-moh.lexc)</small>

---
